Utah statutes.
75-3-104.   Claims against decedent -- Necessity of administration.
No proceeding to enforce a claim against the estate of a decedent or his
successors may be revived or commenced before the appointment of a personal
representative. After the appointment and until distribution, all proceedings
and actions to enforce a claim against the estate are governed by the
procedure prescribed by this Chapter 3. After distribution a creditor whose
claim has not been barred may recover from the distributees as provided in
Section 75-3-1004 or from a former personal representative individually liable
as provided in Section 75-3-1005. This section has no application to a
proceeding by a secured creditor of the decedent to enforce his right to his
security except as to any deficiency judgment which might be sought therein.
